zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材: 健腹墊; 健腹輪; 有氧階梯踏板; 平衡訓練器材; 戰繩; 心肺運動; 韻律球; 健身拉力帶/拉力環; 健身長凳; 運動器材墊; 健身器材/設備組; 運動用斜坡軟墊; 按摩滾筒配件; 按摩滾輪; 手部運動器材; 冰浴與冷水浴缸; 牽引倒立機; 運動球; 增強式跳箱; 引體上升坐地架; 伏地挺身器/單槓; 反應訓練球; 搖搖杯; 阻力傘; 運動安全燈具/反光配件; 碼表; 懸掛訓練繩; 搖擺震動機; 舉重; 重訓服飾; 瑜珈和皮拉提斯
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu: Prostirke za trbušne mišiće; Kotači i valjci za trbušnjake; Steperi za aerobik; Trenažeri za ravnotežu; Konopci za borbu; Kardio; Lopte za vježbanje; Rastezljive trake za vježbanje; Klupe za vježbanje; Prostirke za opremu za vježbanje; Kompleti sprava i opreme za vježbanje; Klinasti jastuk za vježbanje; Pribor za pjenasti valjak; Pjenasti valjci; Sprave za vježbanje ruku; Ledene kupke i kade za hladno uranjanje; Inverzijski stolovi i sustavi; Medicinke; Pliometrijske kutije; Sprave za zgibove i dipseve; Šipke za sklekove i zgibove; Reakcijske lopte; Shaker boce; Padobrani za trening brzine; Sportska sigurnosna svjetla i reflektori; Štoperice; Suspenzijski trenažeri; Vibracijske platforme za vježbanje; Dizanje utega; Odjeća s utezima; Joga i pilates
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning: Magträningsmattor; Träningshjul för magmuskelträning; Aerobics-brädor; Balansträningsredskap; Battleropes; Konditionsträning; Träningsbollar; Träningsband och -slingor; Träningsbänkar; Mattor för träningsutrustning; Träningsmaskin och utrustning; Kilkuddar för träning; Tillbehör till skumgummirullar; Skumgummirullar; Handstärkare; Isbad och kallbad; Ryggsträckare; Medicinbollar; Plyoboxar; Power Towers; Armhävningshandtag; Reaktionsbollar; Shakers; Fallskärmar för snabbhets- och motståndsträning; Säkerhetslampor och -reflexer för sportande; Stoppur; Redskap för suspensionsträning; Maskiner för vibrationsträning; Styrketräning; Kläder med vikter; Yoga och pilates
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet: Vatsalihasmatot; Vatsalihaspyörät ja -rullat; Steppilaudat; Tasapainoharjoitteluvälineet; Treeniköydet; Kestävyysurheilu; Jumppapallot; Jumppanauhat ja voimanauhat; Kuntosalipenkit; Kuntosalimatot; Kuntosalilaite ja -varustesetit; Harjoittelukiilat; Lihashuoltorullien lisätarvikkeet; Lihashuoltorullat; Käsipuristimet; Jääkylvyt ja kylmäaltaat; Inversiopöydät ja -laitteet; Kuntopallot; Plyoboxit; Voimatornit; Punnerrus- ja leuanvetotangot; Reaktiopallot; Sheikkerit; Juoksu- ja vastusvarjot; Turvavalot ja heijastimet urheiluun; Sekuntikellot; Suspensioharjoitteluvälineet; Tärinälaitteet; Painonnosto; Lisäpainovaatteet; Jooga ja pilates
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte: Ab-Mats; Bauchtrainer & -roller; Steppbretter; Balancetrainer; Battle-Ropes; Cardio; Gymnastikbälle; Fitnessbänder; Trainingsbänke; Matten für Heimtrainer; Fitnessgeräte-Sets; Keilmatten; Schaumroller-Zubehör; Schaumroller; Handtrainer; Eisbäder & Kaltwasserbecken; Inversionstische; Medizinbälle; Plyo-Boxen; Power Tower; Klimmzugstangen; Reaktionsbälle; Shaker; Trainings- & Bremsschirme; Sicherheitslichter & -reflektoren für Sport; Stoppuhren; Suspension Trainer; Vibrationstrainer; Gewichtheben; Gewichtswesten & -manschetten; Yoga & Pilates
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具: アブマット; 腹筋ローラー・ホイール; エクササイズステップ; バランストレーニング用品; バトルロープ; 有酸素運動; エクササイズボール; エクササイズバンド・ループ; エクササイズベンチ; 運動器具用フロアマット; エクササイズ マシン、エクササイズ用品セット; ヨガウェッジ; フォームローラー関連用品; フォームローラー; 握力・手首トレーニング器具; アイスバス・コールドプランジタブ; インバージョンテーブル・補助器具; メディシンボール; プライオメトリクスボックス; マルチジム; プッシュアップバー・プルアップバー; リアクションボール; シェイカーボトル; レジスタンスパラシュート; スポーツ用セーフティーライト・リフレクター; ストップウォッチ; サスペンショントレーナー; 振動トレーニングマシン; ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ; ウェイト付きウェア; ヨガ・ピラティス
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais: Ab mats; Rodas e rolos para abdominais; Steps aeróbicos; Aparelhos para treinamento de equilíbrio; Cordas navais; Cardio; Bolas suíças; Faixas e loops de exercício; Bancos para exercício; Colchonetes para equipamentos de ginástica; Conjuntos de equipamentos e máquinas de exercícios; Cunhas de espuma; Acessórios para rolos de espuma; Rolos de espuma; Exercícios manuais; Banheiras de gelo e imersão a frio; Tabelas e sistemas de inversão; Medicine balls; Caixas pliométricas; Barras fixas com paralelas; Barras de flexões; Bolas de reação; Coqueteleiras; Paraquedas para velocidade e resistência; Refletores e luzes de segurança para esportes; Cronômetros; Fitas de suspensão; Plataformas vibratórias; Levantamento de peso; Roupas com peso; Yoga e Pilates
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения: Постелки за коремни упражнения; Колела и ролки за коремни мускули; Степери за аеробика; Тренажори за баланс; Бойни въжета; Кардио тренировки; Топки за упражнения; Тренировъчни ластици; Пейки за упражнения; Подложки за фитнес уреди; Комплекти машини и оборудване за тренировки; Тренировъчни блокове за клек; Аксесоари за фитнес валяци; Фитнес валяци; Упражнения за ръце; Ледени вани и вани за студена терапия; Инверсионни лежанки и системи; Медицински топки; Плиометрични кутии; Фитнес уреди за набиране; Лостове за лицеви опори и набиране; Топки за подобряване на реакциите; Шейкър бутилки; Парашути за скорост и устойчивост; Спортни светлини и предпазни светлоотразители; Хронометри; Тренировъчни системи за окачване; Вибриращи платформи; Вдигане на тежести; Облекло с тежести; Йога и пилатес
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń: Maty do brzuszków; Kółka i wałki do ćwiczeń; Podesty do aerobiku; Trening równowagi; Liny treningowe Battle Ropes; Trening kardio; Piłki do ćwiczeń; Taśmy i pętle do ćwiczeń; Ławki treningowe; Maty pod sprzęt do ćwiczeń; Zestawy urządzeń do ćwiczeń; Kliny do ćwiczeń; Akcesoria do rollerów; Wałki do ćwiczeń; Ściskacze do rąk; Wanny do morsowania i kąpieli lodowych; Ławki i systemy inwersyjne; Piłki lekarskie; Skrzynie plyometryczne; Poręcze wielofunkcyjne; Uchwyty do pompek i drążki do podciągania; Piłki zręcznościowe; Shakery; Spadochrony oporowe; Sportowe światła i reflektory zabezpieczające; Stopery sportowe; Pasy treningowe; Treningowe urządzenia wibracyjne; Podnoszenie ciężarów; Obciążniki; Joga i pilates
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general: Colchonetas para abdominales; Ruedas y rodillos para abdominales; Steps para aeróbic; Material para entrenar el equilibrio; Cuerdas de batalla; Cardio; Balones de gimnasia; Bandas elásticas y cintas para ejercicios; Bancos de ejercicio; Esteras para equipos de gimnasia; Máquinas y equipos de ejercicio; Cuñas de ejercicio; Accesorios para rodillos de espuma para estiramientos; Rodillos de espuma; Ejercitadores para manos; Bañeras de inmersión en frío y baños de hielo; Sistemas y mesas de inversión; Balones para rehabilitación; Cajas pliométricas; Aparatos de musculación; Barras para flexiones y dominadas; Bolas de reacción; Botellas mezcladoras; Paracaídas para velocidad y resistencia; Reflectores y luces de seguridad deportivos; Cronómetros; Sistemas de entrenamiento en suspensión; Máquinas de ejercicio con vibración; Levantamiento de pesas; Ropa con peso; Yoga y pilates
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie: Podložky na brušné svaly; Posilňovacie kolieska a valčeky; Fitness steper; Balančné trenažéry; Tréningové fitness laná; Kardio cvičenie; Cvičebné lopty; Cvičebné pásy a gumy; Lavičky na cvičenie; Podložky na cvičenie; Súpravy cvičebných strojov a zariadení; Cvičebné podložky v tvare klina; Príslušenstvo k penovým valcom; Penové valce; Ručné zariadenia na cvičenie; Ľadové kúpele a studené ponorné vane; Inverzné lavice a systémy; Medicinbaly; Plyometrické boxy; Stojanové posilňovacie konštrukcie; Bradlá s hrazdou; Reakčné lopty; Fľaše so šejkrom; Rýchlostné a odporové padáky; Športové bezpečnostné svetlá a reflektory; Stopky; Závesné trenažéry; Vibračné platformy; Vzpieranie; Oblečenie so závažím; Joga a pilates
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga: Pilvo preso kilimėliai; Pilvo preso treniravimo ratukai ir voleliai; Aerobiniai laipteliai; Pusiausvyros treniruokliai; Kovinės virvės; Kardiotreniruotės; Gimnastikos kamuoliai; Treniruočių juostos ir kilpos; Treniruočių suoliukai; Treniruočių įrangos kilimėliai; Treniruoklių ir įrangos rinkiniai; Gimnastikos pleištai; Putplasčio ritinėlių priedai; Putplasčio ritinėliai; Rankų treniruokliai; Ledo vonios ir šalto vandens vonios; Inversijos stalai ir sistemos; Medicininiai kamuoliai; Plyometrinės dėžės; Vertikalūs kombinuoti treniruokliai; Atsispaudimų ir prisitraukimų skersiniai; Reakcijos lavinimo kamuoliai; Plakimo buteliai; Greičio ir pasipriešinimo parašiutai; Sportiniai saugos žibintai ir atšvaitai; Chronometrai; Kabamieji treniruokliai; Vibraciniai treniruokliai; Sunkioji atletika; Pasunkinti drabužiai; Joga ir pilatesas
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr: Mavemåtter; Abwheels og abrollers; Stepbænke; Balancetrænere; Battle ropes; Cardio; Træningsbolde; Træningselastikker og bånd; Træningsbænke; Måtter til træningsmaskiner; Træningsmaskine- og træningsudstyrssæt; Kilemåtter; Foamroller – tilbehør; Foamroller; Motionsapparater til hænderne; Isbade og koldvandsbassiner; Mave- og rygbænke med vippefunktion; Medicinbolde; Plyometriske kasser; Vægtcentre; Stænger til armbøjninger og armhævninger; Reaktionsbolde; Shakerflasker; Fart- og modstandsskærme; Sikkerhedslys og reflekser til sport; Stopur; Elastiktræning; Vibrationsmaskiner; Vægtløftning; Vægtet tøj; Yoga og pilates
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp: Thảm gập bụng; Bánh xe và con lăn tập cơ bụng; Sàn tập areobic; Máy tập thăng bằng; Dây thừng tập thể lực; Bài tập dành cho tim; Bóng tập; Đai & vòng tập thể dục; Ghế dài tập thể dục; Thảm tập thể dục; Máy và bộ thiết bị tập thể dục; Nêm tập thể dục; Phụ kiện cho ống lăn; Con lăn xốp; Thiết bị/dụng cụ tập bàn tay; Bồn tắm đá & ngâm nước lạnh; Bàn và hệ thống đảo ngược; Bóng thuốc; Bục nhảy Plyo; Cột điện; Xà đẩy và xà kéo; Bóng tập phản xạ; Bình lắc; Dù tốc độ và dù kháng; Đèn an toàn & phản xạ thể thao; Đồng hồ bấm giờ; Đai treo; Máy rung thể dục; Cử tạ; Quần áo tạ tập thể lực; Yoga và Pilate
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları: Ab mat minderleri; Ab Wheel'lar ve Ab Roller'lar; Aerobik Step Tahtası; Denge Eğitim Aletleri; Savaş halatları; Kardiyo; Egzersiz Topları; Egzersiz Bantları ve Döngüleri; Egzersiz Sehpaları; Egzersiz Ekipmanı Matları; Egzersiz Makineleri ve Ekipman Setleri; Eğimli Minder; Köpük Rulo Aksesuarları; Köpük Rulolar; El Egzersiz Aletleri; Buz banyoları ve soğuk su küvetleri; Askı Demirleri ve Sistemleri; Sağlık Topları; Plyometric kutular; Power Tower'lar; Şınav ve Barfiks Demirleri; Reaksiyon Topları; Shaker mataralar; Hız ve Direnç Paraşütleri; Spor Güvenlik Işıkları ve Reflektörler; Kronometreler; Egzersiz Askıları; Titreşimli Egzersiz Makineleri; Ağırlık Kaldırma; Ağırlık Kıyafetleri; Yoga ve Pilates
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général: Tapis pour abdominaux; Roues et rollers abdominaux; Steps d’aérobic; Plateaux d’équilibre; Cordes ondulatoires; Cardio; Ballons d’exercice; Bandes et cerceaux d’exercice; Bancs d’exercice; Tapis pour machines d’exercice; Ensembles de matériel et de machines de sport; Plans inclinés; Accessoires pour rouleau en mousse; Rouleaux en mousse; Appareils d’exercice pour les mains; Bains de glace et bacs à immersion froide; Tables et systèmes d’inversion; Ballons lestés; Boîtes pliométriques; Chaises romaines; Barres de traction et de tirage; Balles de réaction; Gourdes shaker; Parachutes de vitesse et résistance; Feux et réflecteurs de sécurité pour le sport; Chronomètres; Sangles de suspension; Plate-formes vibrantes; Haltérophilie; Vêtements alourdis; Pilates et yoga
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения: Абматы; Колеса и ролики для пресса; Степ-платформы; Инвентарь для тренировки равновесия; Канаты для кроссфита; Кардиотренировки; Гимнастические мячи; Ленты-эспандеры; Тренировочные скамьи; Коврики под тренажеры; Наборы спортивных тренажеров и инвентаря; Клиновидные опорные блоки для тренировок; Аксессуары для массажных роликов; Массажные ролики; Эспандеры для рук; Ледяные ванны и купели; Инверсионные столы и системы; Медболы; Плиометрические боксы; Силовые тренировочные станции; Турники и упоры для отжиманий; Мячи для тренировки реакции; Бутылки-шейкеры; Парашюты для бега; Светящиеся и светоотражающие аксессуары для занятий спортом; Секундомеры; Функциональные петли; Виброплатформы; Тяжелая атлетика; Утяжелители; Йога и пилатес
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo: Podloge za trebušne mišice; Kolesa in valjčki za trebušne mišice; Aerobne stopnice; Vadbene naprave za ravnotežje; Težke vrvi za vadbo; Kardio; Žoge za vadbo; Trakovi in zanke za vadbo; Fitnes klopi; Podloge za vadbeno opremo; Kompleti vadbenih naprav in opreme; Vadbene podloge z naklonom; Dodatki za penaste valje; Penasti valji; Vadbena orodja za roke; Ledene kopeli in hladne kadi; Inverzijske mize in sistemi; Medicinske žoge; Pliometrične škatle; Vadbeni stolpi; Drogovi za sklece in dvigovanje trupa; Reakcijske žogice; Steklenice za stresanje; Hitrostna padala in padala za povečanje vzdržljivosti; Športna varnostna svetila in odsevniki; Štoparice; Vadbeni trakovi; Vibracijske vadbene naprave; Dvigovanje uteži; Obtežilna oblačila; Joga in pilates
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten: Buikspiermatten; Buikspierwielen en -rollers; Aerobic steps; Balanstrainers; Battle ropes; Cardio; Oefenballen; Fitnessbanden en -lussen; Fitnessbanken; Matten voor fitnessapparatuur; Sets voor fitnessapparaten en -benodigdheden; Wigkussens voor fitness; Accessoires voor foamrollers; Schuimrubberen rollers; Handtrainers; IJsbaden en koudwaterbaden; Inversietafels en -systemen; Medicinballen; Plyometrische boxen; Krachtstations; Opdruk- en optrekstangen; Reactieballen; Shakerbekers; Snelheids- en weerstandsparachutes; Sportlampjes en reflectoren; Chronometers; Suspensiontrainers; Trillende fitnessapparaten; Gewichtheffen; Verzwaarde kleding; Yoga en pilates
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening: Magematter; Ab wheels og rollere; Aerobictrinn; Balansetrenere; Battle ropes; Kardio; Treningsballer; Treningsbånd og -løkker; Treningsbenker; Matter for treningsutstyr; Treningsmaskin- og utstyrssett; Treningsblokker; Tilbehør til skumruller; Skumruller; Håndtrener; Isbad og kuldekulper; Inversjonsbord og -systemer; Medisinballer; Plyobokser; Treningsstasjoner; Push- og pull up-stenger; Reaksjonsballer; Shakerflasker; Hurtighets- og motstandsskjermer; Sportssikkerhetslys og -reflektorer; Stoppeklokker; Suspensjonstrenere; Vibrasjonstreningsmaskiner; Vektløfting; Vektede klær; Yoga og pilates
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais: Almofadas abdominais; Rolos e rodas para abdominais; Degraus para aeróbica; Equipamentos de treino de equilíbrio; Cordas de batalha; Cardiofitness; Bolas de exercício; Faixas e argolas de exercício; Bancos de exercício; Tapetes para equipamento de exercício; Conjuntos de equipamento e máquinas de exercício; Cunhas de exercício; Acessórios para rolos de esponja; Rolos de esponja; Exercitadores de mãos; Banhos de gelo e piscinas de imersão a frio; Sistemas e tábuas de inversão; Bolas medicinais; Caixas pliométricas; Power Towers; Barras de elevações; Bolas de reflexos; Garrafas misturadoras; Paraquedas para velocidade e resistência; Refletores e luzes de segurança para desporto; Cronómetros; Equipamentos de treino de suspensão; Máquinas de exercício de vibração; Halterofilismo; Vestuário com pesos; Ioga e pilates
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση: Στρώματα κοιλιακών; Τροχοί & κύλινδροι κοιλιακών; Σκαλοπάτια αερόβιας άσκησης; Εξοπλισμός ισορροπίας; Σχοινιά battle rope; Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης; Μπάλες γυμναστικής; Ελαστικές ταινίες γυμναστικής; Πάγκοι γυμναστικής; Στρώματα εξοπλισμού γυμναστικής; Σετ μηχανημάτων και εξοπλισμού γυμναστικής; Σφήνες γυμναστικής; Αξεσουάρ για χρήση με κυλίνδρους αφρού; Κύλινδροι αφρού; Εξοπλισμός ενδυνάμωσης χεριών; Μπανιέρες πάγου και κρύας βύθισης; Τραπέζια & συστήματα αντιστροφής; Μπάλες γυμναστικής (Medicine balls); Πλειομετρικά κουτιά; Πύργοι γυμναστικής; Μπάρες για κάμψεις και έλξεις; Μπάλες αντίδρασης; Σέικερ; Αλεξίπτωτα ταχύτητας και αντίστασης; Φώτα ασφαλείας και ανακλαστήρες για αθλητισμό; Χρονόμετρα; Ιμάντες αιώρησης για προπόνηση; Μηχανήματα δόνησης για άσκηση; Άρση βαρών; Ενδυμασία με βάρη; Γιόγκα & Pilates
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení: Podložky pod bedra; Kolečka a válečky na posilování břišních svalů; Stupínky na aerobic; Balanční desky; Posilovací lana; Kardio; Cvičební balony; Pásky a gumy na cvičení; Posilovací lavice; Podložky pod cvičební stroje; Sady posilovacích strojů a cvičebního náčiní; Cvičební klíny; Pěnové válce – příslušenství; Pěnové válce; Cvičební pomůcky na ruce; Ledové kádě a ochlazovací vany; Inverzní lavice a systémy; Medicinbaly; Plyometrické bedny; Posilovací věže; Posilovací hrazdy; Míčky React Ball; Šejkry; Tréninkové brzdicí padáky; Bezpečnostní sportovní světla a odrazky; Stopky; Závěsné tréninkové systémy; Vibrační posilovací stroje; Posilování s činkami; Zátěžové oblečení; Jóga a pilates
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés: Hasizomerősítő párnák; Haskerekek és -görgők; Aerob lépők; Egyensúlyedzők; Edzőkötelek; Kardió; Edzőlabdák; Edzőszalagok és -hurkok; Edzőpadok; Edzőfelszerelés-szőnyegek; Edzőgépek és felszereléskészletek; Edzőékek; Habhenger-kiegészítők; Habhengerek; Kézedzők; Jégfürdők és merülőmedencék; Inverziós táblázatok és rendszerek; Medicinlabdák; Pliometrikus dobozok; Erőtornyok; Fekvőtámasz- és felhúzórudak; Reakciólabdák; Shaker kulacsok; Sebesség- és ellenállás-ejtőernyők; Sport biztonsági lámpák és fényvisszaverők; Stopperek; Felfüggesztési trénerek; Vibrációs edzőgépek; Súlyemelés; Súlyozott ruházat; Jóga és pilátesz
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali: Tappetini per addominali; Ruote e rulli per addominali; Step per aerobica; Attrezzi per l'allenamento dell'equilibrio; Battle rope; Cardio; Palloni per esercizi; Fasce e anelli per esercizi; Panche per esercizi; Tappetini attrezzi esercizi; Set di dispositivi e macchine per esercizio; Cunei per esercizi; Accessori per rulli fitness; Cilindri in gommapiuma; Attrezzi per mani; Vasche per bagni di ghiaccio e immersioni a freddo; Sistemi e panche a inversione; Palle mediche; Box pliometrici; Sedie romane; Barre per flessioni; Palline per i riflessi; Borracce shaker; Paracadute per velocità e resistenza; Luci e catarifrangenti per la sicurezza sportiva; Cronometri; Attrezzi per allenamento in sospensione; Macchine per esercizi con vibrazione; Sollevamento pesi; Indumenti pesanti per allenamento; Yoga e pilates
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비: 복근 운동 매트; AB 휠/롤러; 에어로빅 스텝 박스; 밸런스 트레이너; 배틀 로프; 카디오; 짐볼; 운동용 밴드/루프; 운동용 벤치; 운동 장비 매트; 운동 기구/장비 세트; 운동용 웨지; 폼 롤러 부대용품; 폼 롤러; 악력기; 아이스 배스 및 콜드 플런지 욕조; 거꾸리; 메디신 볼; 플라이오메트릭 박스; 파워 타워; 푸쉬업/풀업 바; 리액션 볼; 셰이커 보틀; 속도/저항 낙하산; 스포츠 안전등/반사기; 스톱워치; 서스펜션 트레이너; 진동운동기; 역기 운동; 중량 옷; 요가/필라테스
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment: Ab Mats; Ab Wheels & Rollers; Aerobic Steps; Balance Trainers; Battle Ropes; Cardio; Exercise Balls; Exercise Bands & Loops; Exercise Benches; Exercise Equipment Mats; Exercise Machine & Equipment Sets; Exercise Wedges; Foam Roller Accessories; Foam Rollers; Hand Exercisers; Ice Baths & Cold Plunge Tubs; Inversion Tables & Systems; Medicine Balls; Plyometric Boxes; Power Towers; Push Up & Pull Up Bars; Reaction Balls; Shaker Bottles; Speed & Resistance Parachutes; Sport Safety Lights & Reflectors; Stopwatches; Suspension Trainers; Vibration Exercise Machines; Weight Lifting; Weighted Clothing; Yoga & Pilates
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice: Saltele pentru abdomen; Roți și role pentru exerciții pentru abdomen; Steppere pentru aerobic; Echipamente pentru echilibru; Frânghii battle rope; Cardio; Mingi de fitness; Benzi pentru exerciții; Bănci de fitness; Covorașe pentru echipamente de fitness; Seturi de aparate și echipamente de fitness; Pene pentru exerciții; Accesorii pentru role din spumă; Role din spumă; Aparate de exerciții pentru mâini; Băi de gheață și căzi pentru imersie în apă rece; Mese și sisteme de inversie; Mingi medicinale; Cutii pliometrice; Power Towers; Bare pentru flotări și tracțiuni; Mingi pentru reflexe; Shakere pentru suplimente; Parașute pentru viteză și rezistență; Lumini și reflectoare de siguranță pentru sport; Cronometre; Articole pentru antrenamente de suspensie; Aparate de fitness cu vibrații; Ridicare de greutăți; Obiecte vestimentare cu greutăți; Yoga și Pilates
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材: 仰卧起坐垫; 腹肌轮/健腹器; 有氧踏板; 平衡训练设备; 战绳; 有氧运动; 健身球; 健身带和健身圈; 锻炼椅; 运动器材专用垫; 健身器/设备套装; 运动楔型垫; 泡沫轴配件; 瑜伽柱; 手部锻炼器材; 冰浴浴缸; 倒立机/系统; 重力球; 爆发力跳箱; 健身吊塔; 俯卧撑和引体向上杆; 反应训练球; 摇摇杯; 速度训练阻力伞; 运动安全灯/反光装置; 秒表; 悬挂训练设备; 甩脂机; 举重; 负重衣; 瑜伽与普拉提
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส: เบาะรองหน้าท้อง; ลูกกลิ้งบริหารหน้าท้อง; แท่นเต้นแอโรบิก; อุปกรณ์ฝึกสมดุลร่างกาย; เชือกแบทเทิลโรป; คาร์ดิโอ; ลูกบอลออกกำลังกาย; ยางและห่วงสำหรับออกกำลังกาย; ม้านั่งออกกำลังกาย; ที่รองอุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกาย; เครื่องออกกำลังกายและชุดอุปกรณ์; เบาะลาดเอียงรูปลิ่มสำหรับออกกำลัง; อุปกรณ์ลูกกลิ้งโฟม; ลูกกลิ้งโฟม; ที่ออกกำลังสำหรับมือ; อ่างน้ำแข็งและอ่างแช่น้ำเย็น; เตียงกลับหัว; ลูกบอลน้ำหนัก; กล่องพลัยโอเมตริก; พาวเวอร์ทาวเวอร์; บาร์ดึงข้อและดันข้อ; ลูกบอลรีแอคชัน; แก้วเชคเกอร์; ร่มชูชีพใช้ฝึกความเร็วและแรงต้าน; ไฟและตัวสะท้อนแสงเพื่อความปลอดภัยในการเล่นกีฬา; นาฬิกาจับเวลา; อุปกรณ์ฝึกประเภทสาย; เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบสั่น; ยกน้ำหนัก; เสื้อผ้าถ่วงน้ำหนัก; โยคะและพิลาทีส